Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-805
Waiver; void and unenforceable.

Any waiver of the provisions of the Financial Data Protection and Consumer Notification of Data Security Breach Act of 2006 is contrary to public policy and is void and unenforceable.

Laws 2006, LB 876, § 5.